Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB401.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "tax credit" in section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Tax credit." A tax credit authorized under any of the following:* * *(16.2) Article XIX-L.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIX-LPENNSYLVANIA NATIONAL GUARDEMPLOYER TAX CREDITSection 1901-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Pennsylvania National Guard." The Pennsylvania Army National Guard and the Pennsylvania Air National Guard."Tax credit." The tax credit available to employers of members of any reserve component of the armed forces under this article."Taxpayer." An entity subject to tax under Article III or IV.Section 1902-L. Tax credit for employment.(a) Tax credit available.--A taxpayer is eligible for a tax credit as provided in subsection (b) against the tax imposed under Article III or IV, but shall not include any tax withheld by an employer from an employee under Article III, if:(1) the taxpayer hires an active member of the Pennsylvania National Guard;(2) an employee of the taxpayer enlists in the Pennsylvania National Guard; or20250SB0401PN0347 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) an employee of the taxpayer reenlists in the Pennsylvania National Guard.(b) Maximum tax credit.--A taxpayer may claim a tax credit in the amount of $1,000 for each full-time employee who qualifies under subsection (a)(1), (2) or (3). A taxpayer may claim a tax credit under this section only once with respect to each qualified employee and may not claim a tax credit if a previous employer of the employee claimed a tax credit.(c) Claim period.--Claims for a tax credit shall be filed for the first taxable year for which the taxpayer was entitled to claim the tax credit. Failure to comply with this subsection shall constitute a waiver of the tax credit.Section 1903-L. Carryover and carryback of tax credit.(a) Excess tax credit.--If a taxpayer cannot use the entire amount of the tax credit for the first taxable year in which the employer is eligible for the tax credit, the excess may be carried over to succeeding taxable years and used as a tax credit against the qualified tax liability of the taxpayer for those taxable years.(1) Each time the tax credit is carried over to a succeeding taxable year, it shall be reduced by the amount that was used as a credit during the immediately preceding taxable year.(2) The tax credit provided by this article may be carried over and applied to succeeding taxable years for no more than three taxable years following the first taxable year for which the taxpayer was entitled to claim the tax credit.(b) No carryback.--A taxpayer is not entitled to carry back or obtain a refund of an unused tax credit.20250SB0401PN0347 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1904-L. Total amount of tax credits.The total amount of tax credits authorized by this article shall not exceed $5,000,000 in each fiscal year. If the tax credits exceed the $5,000,000 cap in a given year, the tax credits shall be allocated on a pro rata basis.Section 1905-L. Regulations.The department shall prepare any forms that may be necessary to claim a tax credit, may require proof of the claim for the tax credit and may adopt rules and promulgate regulations to administer the tax credit.Section 3. This act shall apply to tax years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250SB0401PN0347 - 4 - 12345678910111213